test/src/morphology/myv-tests_gt-norm.yaml
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакасонкседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакасонксекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакасонксесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакасонксенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакасонксентень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакасонкседенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакасонксесэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакасонксестэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакасонксеванть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакасонксевтементь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакасонксешканть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакасонксексэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакасонксетне
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакасонксетнень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакасонксетненень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакасонксетнеде
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакасонксетнесэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакасонксетнестэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакасонксетнес
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакасонксетнева
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакасонксетнекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакасонксетнев
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакасонксетневтеме
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакасонксетнешка
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакасонксетненек
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакастонкседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакастонксекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакастонксесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакастонксенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакастонксентень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакастонкседенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакастонксесэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакастонксестэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакастонксеванть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакастонксевтементь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакастонксешканть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакастонксексэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакастонксетне
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакастонксетнень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакастонксетненень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакастонксетнеде
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакастонксетнесэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакастонксетнестэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакастонксетнес
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастонксетнева
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастонксетнекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакастонксетнев
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакастонксетневтеме
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакастонксетнешка
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакастонксетненек
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакаванкседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакаванксекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакаванксесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакаванксенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакаванксентень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакаванкседенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакаванксесэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакаванксестэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакаванксеванть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакаванксевтементь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакаванксешканть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакаванксексэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакаванксетне
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакаванксетнень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакаванксетненень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакаванксетнеде
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакаванксетнесэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакаванксетнестэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакаванксетнес
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакаванксетнева
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакаванксетнекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакаванксетнев
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакаванксетневтеме
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакаванксетнешка
    псака+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакаванксетненек
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакаксонкседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакаксонксекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакаксонксесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакаксонксенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакаксонксентень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакаксонкседенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакаксонксесэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакаксонксестэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакаксонксеванть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакаксонксевтементь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакаксонксешканть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакаксонксексэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакаксонксетне
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакаксонксетнень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакаксонксетненень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакаксонксетнеде
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакаксонксетнесэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакаксонксетнестэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакаксонксетнес
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакаксонксетнева
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакаксонксетнекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакаксонксетнев
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакаксонксетневтеме
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакаксонксетнешка
    псака+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px2Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакаксонксетненек
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакастседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакастсекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакастсесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакастсенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакастсентень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакастседенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакастсесэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакастсестэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакастсеванть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакастсевтементь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакастсевтомонть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакастсексэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакастсетне
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакастсетнень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакастсетненень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакастсетнеде
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакастсетнесэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакастсетнестэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакастсетнес
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастсетнева
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастсетнекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакастсетнев
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакастсетневтеме
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакастсетнешка
    псака+N+NbAmb+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакастсетненек
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакавтомостседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакавтомостсекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакавтомостсесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакавтомостсенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакавтомостсентень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакавтомостседенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсесэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсестэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсеванть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсевтементь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсевтомонть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсексэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакавтомостсетне
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакавтомостсетнень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакавтомостсетненень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакавтомостсетнеде
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакавтомостсетнесэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакавтомостсетнестэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакавтомостсетнес
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакавтомостсетнева
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакавтомостсетнекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакавтомостсетнев
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакавтомостсетневтеме
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакавтомостсетнешка
    псака+N+NbAmb+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакавтомостсетненек
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакашкастседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакашкастсекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакашкастсесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакашкастсенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакашкастсентень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакашкастседенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакашкастсесэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакашкастсестэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакашкастсеванть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакашкастсевтементь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакашкастсешканть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакашкастсексэнть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакашкастсетне
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакашкастсетнень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакашкастсетненень
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакашкастсетнеде
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакашкастсетнесэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакашкастсетнестэ
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакашкастсетнес
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакашкастсетнева
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакашкастсетнекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакашкастсетнев
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакашкастсетневтеме
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакашкастсетнешка
    псака+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакашкастсетненек
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакасостседе
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакасостсекс
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакасостсесь
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакасостсенть
    псака+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакасостсентень
